West Virginia, session 2026, SB347.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9 -1. Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 16, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-23-7 of this code, modified by the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 13, 2025, relating to the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners (standards of ethics, 18 CSR 05), is authorized.